California statutes. Financial Code
 closed. If a multiple level parking area satisfies the conditions of this subdivision and would therefore otherwise be a defined parking area, only the single parking level deemed by the operator of the automated teller machine to be the most directly accessible to the users of the automated teller machine shall be a defined parking area.

(h) “Hours of darkness” means the period that commences 30 minutes after sunset and ends 30 minutes before sunrise.

(i) “Operator” means any bank, savings association, credit union, industrial loan company, savings bank, or other business entity, or any person who operates an automated teller machine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 825, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Location and Installation [13030. - 13031.]

13030.

On or before July 1, 1991, with respect to all existing installed automated teller machines in this state, and any automated teller machines installed after July 1, 1991, the operator shall adopt procedures for evaluating the safety of the automated teller machine. These procedures shall include a consideration of the following:

(a) The extent to which the lighting for the automated teller machine complies or will comply with the standards required by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 13040).

(b) The presence of landscaping,
 vegetation, or other obstructions in the area of the automated teller machine, the access area, and the defined parking area. 

(c) The incidence of crimes of violence in the immediate neighborhood of the automated teller machine, as reflected in the records of the local law enforcement agency and of which the operator has actual knowledge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 825, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13031.

It is not the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to impose a duty to relocate or modify automated teller machines upon the occurrence of any particular events or circumstances, but rather to establish a standard of good faith for the evaluation of all automated teller machines as provided herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 825, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Lighting [13040. - 13041.]

13040.

(a) Each operator of an automated teller machine installed on or after July 1, 1991, shall comply with Section 13041 commencing on the date the automated teller machine is installed. Compliance with Section 13041 by operators as to automated teller machines existing as of July 1, 1991, shall be optional until July 1, 1993, and mandatory thereafter. This subdivision shall apply to an operator of an automated teller machine only to the extent that the operator controls the access area or defined parking area to be lighted.

(b) If an access area or a defined parking area is
 not controlled by the operator of the automated teller machine, and if the person who leased the automated teller machine site to the operator controls the access area or defined parking area, the person who controls the access area or defined parking area shall comply with Section 13041 as to any automated teller machine installed on or after July 1, 1991, commencing on the date the automated teller machine is installed; and as to any automated teller machine existing as of July 1, 1991, no later than on July 1, 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 825, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

13041.

The operator, owner, or other person responsible therefor, shall provide lighting during hours of darkness with respect to an open and operating automated teller machine and any defined parking area, access area, and the exterior of an enclosed automated teller machine installation according to the following standards:

(a) There shall be a minimum of 10 candlefoot power at the face of the automated teller machine and extending in an unobstructed direction outward five feet. 

(b) There shall be a minimum of two candlefoot power
 within 50 feet from all unobstructed directions from the face of the automated teller machine. In the event the automated teller machine is located within 10 feet of the corner of the building and the automated teller machine is generally accessible from the adjacent side, there shall be minimum of two candlefoot power along the first 40 unobstructed feet of the adjacent side of the building.

(c) There shall be a minimum of two candlefoot power in that portion of the defined parking area within 60 feet of the automated teller machine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 825, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Consumer Education [13050. - 13050.]

13050.

Customers receiving access devices shall be furnished by the respective issuers thereof with notices of basic safety precautions which customers should employ while using an automated teller machine. This information shall be furnished by personally delivering or by mailing the information to each customer whose mailing address as to the account to which the access device relates is in this state. This information shall be furnished with respect to access devices issued on or after July 1, 1991, at or before the time the customer is furnished with his or her access device. With respect to a customer to whom an “accepted access device” (as defined in Federal
 Reserve Board Regulation E) has been issued prior to July 1, 1991, the information shall be delivered or mailed to the customer on or before December 31, 1991. Only one notice need be furnished per household, and if access devices are furnished to more than one customer for a single account or set of accounts or on the basis of a single application or other request for the access devices, only a single notice need be furnished in satisfaction of the notification responsibilities as to all those customers. The information may be included with other disclosures related to the access device furnished to the customer, such as with any initial or periodic disclosure statement furnished pursuant to the Electronic Fund Transfer Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 825, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Exemptions [13060. - 13060.]

13060.

The provisions of this division shall not apply with respect to any automated teller machine which is:

(a) Located inside of a building, unless it is a freestanding installation which exists for the sole purpose of providing an enclosure for the automated teller machine.

(b) Located inside of a building, except to the extent a transaction can be conducted from outside the building.

(c) Located in any area, including any access area, building, enclosed space, or
 parking area which is not controlled by the operator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 825, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Effect of Compliance [13070. - 13070.]

13070.

This division supersedes and preempts all rules, regulations, codes, statutes, or ordinances of all cities, counties, cities and counties, municipalities, and local agencies regarding customer safety at automated teller machines located in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 825, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4.5. AUTOMATED TELLER MACHINE SURCHARGE DISCLOSURE [13080. - 13083.]

13080.

(a) No operator of an automated teller machine (ATM) in this state shall impose any surcharge upon a customer for the usage of that machine whether or not the customer is using an access device issued by that operator unless that surcharge is clearly disclosed to the customer electronically on the automated teller machine. Unless the disclosure is made prior to the customer being obligated to pay the surcharge, the customer shall be provided an opportunity to cancel that transaction without incurring any surcharge. This subdivision does not
apply to a point of sale transaction at an ATM.

(b) If the sale of a good or service is conducted at the ATM, the operator of that ATM shall disclose to the customer electronically on the ATM the total price of the good or service and any fee charged solely for the usage of the ATM. Unless the disclosure is made prior to the customer being obligated to pay for the good or service, the customer shall be provided with an opportunity to cancel the transaction without incurring any obligation.

(c) If a surcharge is imposed on a customer using an access device not issued by the operator, the operator shall disclose that the customer may also be charged an additional fee by his or her own institution.

(d) As used in this section, “operator,” “automated teller machine,” “customer,” and “access device” have the meanings set
forth in Section 13020. The term “surcharge” means any charge imposed by the operator of the ATM solely for use of the ATM. The term “service” includes, but is not limited to, receiving a statement of account activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 98, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 98.)
-------------------------------------------

13081.

(a) In enacting this section, the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) It is in the best interest of consumers in this state to be aware of fees they may be charged for using point-of-sale devices prior to being obligated to pay those fees.

(2) In 1996, the Legislature enacted Assembly Bill 3366 (Chapter 98 of the Statutes of 1996), which required operators of automatic teller machines (ATMs) to
electronically disclose fees for transactions at those ATMs. That legislation did not require disclosure of fees at point-of-sale devices.

(3) In order to maximize consumer awareness of fees at point-of-sale devices, and to create equity between operators of ATMs and operators of point-of-sale devices, it is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to require the maximum feasible disclosure of fees at point-of-sale devices.

(b) No operator of a point-of-sale device in this state shall impose any fee upon a customer for the use of that device unless that fee is disclosed to the customer prior to the customer being obligated to pay for any goods or services. That disclosure shall be placed on or at the point-of-sale device as follows:

(1) For all point-of-sale devices, the fee disclosure shall be on a
label meeting federal standards.

(2) For point-of-sale devices purchased on or after January 1, 2001, that have electronic displays, the fee disclosure shall also be electronic.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “point-of-sale device” includes any device used for the purchase of a good or service where a personal identification number (PIN) is required, but does not include an access device as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 13020.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “operator of a point-of-sale device” means the person who imposes the fee on a customer for using a point-of-sale device to pay for a good or service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13082.

(a) Whenever a point-of-sale system is changed or modified to include a video touch screen or any other nontactile keypad, the point-of-sale device that would include the video touch screen or nontactile keypad shall also be equipped with either of the following:

(1) A tactually discernible numerical keypad similar to a telephone keypad containing a raised dot with a dot base diameter between 1.5 millimeters and 1.6 millimeters and a height between 0.6 millimeters and 0.9
millimeters on the number 5 key that enables a visually impaired person to enter his or her own personal identification number or any other personal information necessary to process the transaction in a manner that provides the opportunity for the same degree of privacy input and output available to all individuals.

(2) Other technology, such as a radio frequency identification device, fingerprint biometrics, or some other mechanism that enables a visually impaired person to access the video touch screen device with his or her personal identifier and to process his or her transaction in a manner that provides the opportunity for the same degree of privacy input and output available to all individuals.

(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2010, any existing point-of-sale system, except as provided in paragraph (2), that includes a video touch screen or any other
nontactile keypad shall also be equipped with a tactually discernable keypad or other technology as described in subdivision (a).

(2) At locations equipped with two or less point-of-sale machines, only one point-of-sale machine shall be required to be equipped with a tactually discernible keypad or other technology on or before January 1, 2010, as described in subdivision (a).

(c) On and after January 1, 2006, a manufacturer or distributor shall be required to offer for availability touch screen or other nontactile point-of-sale devices to be used and sold in this state that are equipped with tactually discernible keypads or other technology as described in subdivision (a) that enable a visually impaired person to enter his or her own personal identification number or any other personal information necessary to process a transaction in a manner that ensures personal privacy of the
information being entered.

(d) As used in this section, “point-of-sale device” includes any device used by a customer for the purchase of a good or service where a personal identification number (PIN) is required, but does not include the following:

(1) An automated teller machine as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 13020.

(2) A point-of-sale device that is equipped to, or exclusively services, motor fuel dispensers.

(e) A unit is not in compliance with this section unless it includes a device, whether internal or external to the unit, that does not lend itself to easy removal, allows visually impaired users easy access, and otherwise meets the terms and conditions of this section. If the device is freestanding, it shall be permanently attached to
the unit by means of a braided wire or some other tether.

(f) This section shall not be construed to preclude or limit any other existing right or remedy as it pertains to point-of-sale devices and accessibility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13083.

(a) Subject to the requirements of Section 13080, an agreement to operate or share an automated teller machine may not prohibit, limit, or restrict the right of the operator or owner of the automated teller machine to charge a customer conducting a transaction using an account from a financial institution that is located outside the United States an access fee or surcharge not otherwise prohibited under state or federal law.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), nothing in this
section shall be construed to prohibit or otherwise limit the ability of an operator or owner of an automated teller machine to voluntarily enter into an agreement regarding participation in a surcharge free network.

(c) For purposes of this section, the terms “operator” and “automated teller machine” have the meanings set forth in Section 13020.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “owner” means any entity that is not an operator under Section 13020, but that owns an automated teller machine.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 256, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. CREDIT UNIONS [14000. - 16906.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [14000. - 14053.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [14000. - 14007.]

14000.

This division shall be known as the “California Credit Union Law.”

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14001.

The definitions given in this division govern the construction of this division unless the context otherwise requires.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14001.1.

This division is applicable to any person, other than a federal credit union engaging in the business of a credit union in this state. For purposes of this division, “person” shall have the meaning set forth in Section 5065 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 3.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14001.5.

If and to the extent that any provision of this division is preempted by federal law, the provision shall not apply and shall not be enforced.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 4.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.

A credit union is a cooperative, organized for the purposes of promoting thrift and savings among its members, creating a source of credit for them at rates of interest set by the board of directors, and providing an opportunity for them to use and control their own money on a democratic basis in order to improve their economic and social conditions. As a cooperative, a credit union conducts its business for the mutual benefit and general welfare of its members with the earnings, savings, benefits, or services of the credit union being distributed to its members as patrons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 209, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), all provisions of law applicable to nonprofit mutual benefit corporations generally (including, but not limited to, the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code)) shall apply to credit unions. However, whenever any provision of this division applicable to credit unions is inconsistent with any provision of law applicable to nonprofit mutual benefit corporations generally, the provision of this division shall
 apply and the inconsistent provision of law applicable to nonprofit mutual benefit corporations generally shall not apply to a credit union.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a), the following provisions of the Corporations Code are not applicable to credit unions:

(1) Section 7131.

(2) Subdivision (a) of Section 7132.

(3) Section 7142.

(4) Subdivision (c) of Section 7223.

(5) Subdivision (c) of Section 7225.

(6) Article 4 (commencing with Section 7240) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Title 1.

(7) Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 8110) of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 1.

(8) Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 8610) of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 1.

(9) Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 8710) of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 5.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14003.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 114.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14004.

“Impaired capital” means that the losses or projected losses of a credit union are such that the book value of a member’s share is reduced below 100 percent of the monetary amount of that share when initially purchased plus any accumulated dividends.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 716, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.

Unless otherwise defined in this division, “insolvent” means a credit union has ceased to pay its debts in the ordinary course of business, or cannot pay its debts as they become due, or is insolvent within the meaning of the federal bankruptcy law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 716, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14006.

“Credit manager” means a natural person approved by the board of directors and employed by a credit union to supervise the lending activities of the credit union in accordance with the loan policies established by the board of directors and consistent with the applicable state and federal law and regulations. A credit manager may be but is not required to be a member of the credit union.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14007.

“Obligation” means any contractual obligation to the credit union for money borrowed or credit extended or guaranteed from its members, including, but not limited to, loans, lines of credit, agreements to extend credit, and lease agreements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 789, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General [14050. - 14053.]

14050.

The use by any person, other than those authorized by this division, of any name or title which contains the phrase “credit union,” is a misdemeanor. Nonprofit associations, which are formed for the mutual benefit and protection of credit unions, by credit unions organized under this division, or under the provisions of the statutes of the United States applicable to credit unions or any nonprofit association formed for the mutual benefit and protection of credit union employees by bona fide employees of credit unions, may use the phrase “credit union” in the name or title designating any such association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14051.

Any person who willfully and knowingly makes, circulates, or transmits to another or others any statement or rumor, written, printed or by word of mouth, which is untrue in facts and is directly or by inference derogatory to the financial condition or affects the solvency or financial standing of any credit union doing business in this state, or who knowingly counsels, aids, procures, or induces another to start, transmit, or circulate any such statement or rumor, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14052.

In addition to the powers enumerated in this division, every credit union has the general powers conferred upon corporations by the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law of this state unless restricted by this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 131.)
-------------------------------------------

14053.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Fee” means a nonsufficient funds fee or an overdraft fee.

(2) “Nonsufficient funds fee” means a fee resulting from the initiation of a transaction that exceeds the member’s available account balance if the
 member’s credit union declines to make the payment.

(3) “Overdraft fee” means a fee resulting from the processing of a transaction that exceeds a member’s available account balance.

(b) (1) A credit union shall provide a notice to a member each time the credit union assesses a fee that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) The notice shall be provided to the member using a communication method designated by the member for receiving this type of notice.

(B) The notice shall be provided on the same business day the transaction that resulted in the fee occurred, unless
 it is not feasible to provide the notice that day, in which case the notice shall be provided on the next business day.

(C) The notice shall contain all of the following:

(i) The date of the transaction.

(ii) The type of transaction.

(iii) Whether the transaction was declined or processed.

(iv) If applicable, the amount of the overdraft that results from the transaction.

(v) If applicable, the amount necessary to return the account to a positive balance.

(vi) If applicable, the consequences of not returning the account to a positive balance within a certain
 timeframe.

(vii) If applicable, the amount of time the member has to return the account to a positive balance to avoid the consequences described in clause (vi).

(2) If the account has more than one accountholder, provision of the notice described in paragraph (1) to any accountholder shall be sufficient.

(c) Beginning January 1, 2026, a credit union shall not charge a fee exceeding fourteen dollars ($14) or the amount set by the
 federal Consumer Financial Protection Bureau for the fee, whichever is lower.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 521, Sec. 1.   (SB 1075)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Formation [14100. - 14156.]



  ARTICLE 1. Incorporation and Bylaws [14100. - 14103.]

14100.

(a) Credit unions shall be incorporated under the Nonprofit Mutual Benefit Corporation Law of this state.

(b) The Secretary of State shall not file the articles of incorporation of a credit union organized pursuant to subdivision (a) unless the approval of the commissioner is endorsed thereon.

(c) The Secretary of State shall not file articles of incorporation setting forth a name in which “credit union” or
 related words appear unless the approval of the commissioner is attached. This section shall not apply to the articles of any corporation subject to the California Credit Union Law on which the approval of the commissioner is endorsed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 6.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14101.

The articles of incorporation of every credit union shall set forth the following:

(a) The name of the corporation, which shall include the phrase “credit union.”

(b) (1) The following statement:

The purpose of the corporation is to engage in credit union business and any other lawful activities which are not prohibited to a credit union by applicable laws or regulations.

(2) By December 31, 2003, each credit union that immediately prior to the enactment of this section was authorized
 to operate as a credit union shall amend its articles to comply with the provisions of paragraph (1). Notwithstanding Section 7813.5 of the Corporations Code, the amendment of the articles of a credit union as required by paragraph (1) may be adopted by approval of the board alone.

(c) The name and street address in this state of the corporation’s initial agent for service of process in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 8210 of the Corporations Code.

(d) The names and addresses of five or more persons appointed to act as initial directors.

(e) The street address of the corporation.

(f) The mailing address of the corporation, if different from the street
 address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 494, Sec. 53.   (SB 1532)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14101.2.

(a) The articles shall be signed by each director named in the articles, acknowledged pursuant to Section 5030 of the Corporations Code and filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

(b) Corporate existence shall begin upon the filing of the articles and shall continue perpetually, unless otherwise expressly provided by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 8.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14101.4.

(a) The provisions of Section 14101, except as provided in subdivision (b) of that section, shall not apply to a credit union organized prior to January 1, 1981, but the articles of the credit union shall continue to be governed by the law applicable as of December 31, 1980, until an amendment of its articles pursuant to subdivision (b).

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 14101, a credit union organized prior to January 1, 1981, may amend its articles to
 conform to Section 14101 except that an initial agent for service of process shall not be set forth and the names and addresses of initial directors shall be deleted. The amendment may be adopted by the board of directors alone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 9.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14101.6.

(a) Every credit union shall, within 90 days after the filing of its original articles and annually thereafter during the applicable filing period in each year, file, in a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, a statement containing: (1) the name of the credit union and the Secretary of State’s file number; (2) the names and complete business or residence addresses of its chief executive officers, secretary, and chief financial officer; (3) the street address of its principal office, if any; (4) if the credit union chooses to receive renewal notices and any other notifications from the Secretary of State by electronic mail instead of by United States mail, a valid electronic mail address for the credit union or for the credit union’s designee to receive those notices; and (5) the
 mailing address of the credit union, if different from the street address of its principal office.

(b) The statement required by subdivision (a) shall also designate, as the agent of the credit union for the purpose of service of process, a natural person residing in this state or any domestic or foreign business corporation that has complied with Section 1505 of the Corporations Code and whose capacity to act as an agent has not terminated. If a natural person is designated, the statement shall set forth that person’s complete business or residence street address. If a corporate agent is designated, no address for it shall be set forth.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the applicable filing period for a credit union shall be the calendar month during which its original articles were filed and the immediately preceding five calendar months. The Secretary of State shall
 provide a notice to each credit union to comply with this section approximately three months prior to the close of the applicable filing period. The notice shall state the due date for compliance and shall be sent to the last address of the credit union according to the records of the Secretary of State if the credit union has elected to receive notices from the Secretary of State by electronic mail. Neither the failure of the Secretary of State to provide the notice nor the failure of the credit union to receive it is an excuse for failure to comply with this section.

(d) Whenever any of the information required by subdivision (a) is changed, the credit union may file a current statement containing all the information required thereby. In order to change its agent for service of process or the address of the agent, the corporation must file a current statement containing all the information required by subdivisions (a) and (b). Whenever any
 statement is filed pursuant to this section, it supersedes any previously filed statement and the statement in the articles as to the agent for service of process and the address of the agent.

(e) An agent designated for service of process pursuant to subdivision (b) may deliver to the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State for filing, a signed and acknowledged written statement of resignation as an agent for service of process containing the name of the credit union and Secretary of State’s file number of the credit union, the name of the agent, and a statement that the agent is resigning. Thereupon the authority of the agent to act in such capacity shall cease and the Secretary of State forthwith shall notify the credit union of the filing of the statement of resignation.

(f) If a natural person who has been designated agent for service of process
 pursuant to subdivision (b) dies or resigns or no longer resides in the state, or if the corporate agent for such purpose resigns, dissolves, withdraws from the state, forfeits its right to transact intrastate business, has its corporate rights, powers, and privileges suspended or ceases to exist, the credit union shall forthwith file a new statement designating a new agent conforming to the requirements of subdivision (a).

(g) The resignation of an agent may be effective if, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State containing the name of the credit union and Secretary of State’s file number for the credit union and the name of the agent for service of process, the agent disclaims having been properly appointed as the agent.

(h) The Secretary of State may destroy or otherwise dispose of any statement or resignation filed pursuant to this section after it has been superseded
 by the filing of a new statement.

(i) This section shall not be construed to place any person dealing with the credit union on notice of or in any duty to inquire about the existence or content of the statement filed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 834, Sec. 49.   (SB 1041)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14101.8.

(a) No amendment of the articles of a credit union shall become effective unless the certificate of amendment or other instrument setting forth the amendment is filed with the Secretary of State with the commissioner’s approval endorsed thereon. The amendment shall become effective upon being filed with the Secretary of State. Promptly after the amendment becomes effective, the credit union shall file with the commissioner a copy of the certificate of amendment or other instrument certified by the Secretary of State.

(b) An amendment of the articles set forth in an agreement of merger that requires the approval of the commissioner shall not be subject to the provisions of subdivision (a). An amendment meeting this criteria shall become effective at the time the merger becomes effective, pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 10.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14102.

(a) Amendments to the articles of incorporation of any credit union may be adopted by resolution of the board of directors, which is also adopted by a vote of a majority of the members of the credit union present, in person or by proxy, as provided in the credit union’s bylaws, at any regular or special meeting of the members for which notice of the proposed amendments has been given; provided, however, that a minimum vote of at least 10 percent of the entire membership entitled to vote on the question votes in favor of the amendment and
 those voting in favor of the amendment constitute a majority of the members participating in the vote.

(b) The commissioner may approve the amendment according to the resolution adopted by the board of directors if approved by less than 10 percent of the entire membership as provided in this section if the commissioner finds, upon the written and verified application filed by the board of directors, that (1) notice of the meeting called to consider the amendment or the ballot for written vote on the amendment was mailed to each member entitled to vote upon the question, (2) the notice or ballot disclosed the purpose of the meeting or the written vote, (3) the notice or ballot informed the membership that approval of the amendment might be sought pursuant to this section, and (4) a majority of the votes cast upon the question were in favor of the amendment.

(c) Notwithstanding
 subdivision (a) and Section 7812 of the Corporations Code, a credit union may amend its articles of incorporation to change its name with the approval of its board of directors and without the approval of its members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 539, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

14102.2.

(a) No restated articles of a credit union shall become effective unless the certificate setting forth the restated articles, with the commissioner’s approval endorsed thereon, is filed with the Secretary of State. The restated articles shall become effective upon being filed with the Secretary of State.

(b) Promptly after the restated articles become effective, the credit union shall file with the commissioner a copy of the certificate setting forth the restated articles,
 certified by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 11.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14102.4.

(a) No certificate of correction of a credit union shall become effective unless the certificate, with the commissioner’s approval endorsed thereon, is filed with the Secretary of State. The certificate of correction shall become effective upon being filed with the Secretary of State.

(b) Promptly after the certificate of correction becomes effective, the credit union shall file with the commissioner a copy of the certificate of correction, certified by the Secretary of
 State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 12.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14102.6.

(a) No certificate of revocation by a credit union shall become effective unless the certificate, with the commissioner’s approval endorsed thereon, is filed with the Secretary of State. The certificate of revocation shall become effective upon being filed with the Secretary of State.

(b) Promptly after the certificate of revocation becomes effective, the credit union shall file with the commissioner a copy of the certificate of revocation, certified by the Secretary of
 State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 734, Sec. 13.   Effective September 20, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14103.

The bylaws shall prescribe the manner in which the business of the credit union shall be conducted with reference to the following matters:

(a) The purpose of the credit union.

(b) The qualification for membership.

(c) Determination of the month, time, and place of the annual meeting; the manner of conducting meetings; the method by which members shall be notified of meetings; and the number of members which shall constitute a quorum.

(d) The authorized number of directors, the number of directors necessary to constitute a quorum, and the powers and duties of officers elected by the
 directors.

(e) The membership, powers, and duties of the supervisory or audit committee, as applicable.

(f) The membership, powers, and duties of the credit committee or if applicable, the general powers, responsibilities, and duties of the credit manager.

(g) The manner in which the bylaws may be amended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 57.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Certificate to Act as a Credit Union [14150. - 14156.]

14150.

No membership shares, certificates for funds or other securities shall be issued by any credit union until it has applied for and obtained from the commissioner a certificate authorizing it to act as a credit union.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14151.

Applications for a certificate to act as a credit union shall be made in writing to the commissioner, setting forth such information as the commissioner requires. The application shall be verified by one or more officers of the credit union authorized by its board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14152.

At the time of filing an application to operate as a credit union, the applicant shall pay to the commissioner a filing fee of five dollars ($5).

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

14153.
